src/fst/morphology/orig/srcV2/esu.twol.permissive.xfst
! LANGUAGE: "esu"
! AUTHOR: "Lonny Alaskuk Strunk"

! This Central Alaskan Yup'ik FST morphological analyzer/generator and the 
! associated source code is available under the GNU Affero General Public 
! License (GNU AGPL v.3):
!
! Copyright (C) 2020 Lonny Alaskuk Strunk
!
! This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it under 
! the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by the Free 
! Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or (at your option) any 
! later version.
!
! This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but WITHOUT 
! ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS 
! FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU Affero General Public License for more 
! details.
!
! You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License along 
! with this program. If not, see https://www.gnu.org/licenses/.


!! NOTE !!!
! 1. Morpheme Operators are indicated by ["<"|">"|"$"|"&"]
! 2. Vowels may be hatted or stressed (i.e. a -> [â|á])

! TODO:
!   - 

define Sep        ["<"|">"|"&"|"↞"|"↠"];

define Stop       [ p | t | c | k | q ];
define VoiceFric  [ v | l | s | g | r | u͡g | u͡r | ġ ];
define VlessFric  [ vv | ll | ss | gg | rr | u͡gg | u͡rr ];
define VoiceNasal [ m | n | ng ];
define VlessNasal [ m̄ | n̄ | n͞g ];

define VoiceCon   [ VoiceFric | VoiceNasal ];
define VlessCon   [ VlessFric | VlessNasal | Stop ];

define Fric       [ VlessFric  | VoiceFric  ];
define Nasal      [ VlessNasal | VoiceNasal ];

define Con        [ Stop | Fric | Nasal | w | y ];

define FVow       [ a | i | u | ạ | ụ ];
define FVowStress [ á | í | ú | ạ́ | ụ́ ];
define FVowHatted [ â | î | û | ậ | ụ̂ ];
define AllFVow    [ FVow | FVowStress | FVowHatted ];
define Vow        [ FVow | e ];
define VowStress  [ FVowStress | é ];
define VowHatted  [ FVowHatted | ê ];
define AllVow     [ Vow | VowStress | VowHatted ];

define AutomaticDevoicing v -> vv,
                          l -> ll,
                          s -> ss,
                          g -> gg,
                          r -> rr,
                          u͡g -> u͡gg,
                          u͡r -> u͡rr || [ Stop | VlessFric ] Sep* _  ,
                                     _ Sep* [ Stop | VlessFric ]             .o.
                          m -> m̄,
                          n -> n̄,
                          ng -> n͞g || [ Stop | VlessFric ] Sep* _   ;

! Unnecessary devoicing                          
!                          r -> rr  || _ Sep* .#.                            .o.
!                          s -> ss  || .#. Sep* _                             ;

define WeakInitialE [..] -> e   || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con _ Sep* Con                      .o. ! [é]nmek -> [e]nemek
                       ê -> e   || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con _ Sep* Con                      .o. ! [e]nêli -> enel'iuq
                    [..] -> "'" || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con AllVow Sep+ Con _ Sep* AllVow   .o. ! [e]nemek -> nem'ek
                    [..] -> "'" || .#. ["[e]"|"[é]"] Con AllVow Con _ Sep+ AllVow        .o. ! [e]mer -> mer'et
                    ["[e]"|"[é]"] -> 0  || .#. _ Con AllVow Sep* Con                      ;  ! drop weak e ; not [e]nii

define urDeletion [ụ|ụ́] r (->) u r                           || g Sep _ l                .o. ! acagurluq (HBC form)
                  [ụ|ụ́] r -> e ("'") "u͡r"                    || g Sep _ l                .o. ! acageu͡rluq/acage'u͡rluq
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) r u                         || Vow Vow Sep+ _ l         .o. ! uiruluq (HBC form)
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r -> "u͡r"                          || Vow Vow Sep+ _ l         .o. ! uiu͡rluq
                  ê Sep+ r [ụ|ụ́] r (->)  Sep r u             || _ l                      .o. ! tumruluq (HBC form)
                  ê Sep+ r [ụ|ụ́] r -> e Sep ("'") "u͡r"       || _ l                      .o. ! tumeu͡rluq/tume'u͡rluq
                  [e|é] Sep+ r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) Sep u "'" r      || _ l                      .o. ! qaspu'rluq (HBC form)
                  [e|é] Sep+ r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) e Sep ("'") "u͡r" || _ l                      .o. ! qaspeu͡rluq/qaspe'u͡rluq
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r (->) r u                         || VowHatted Sep+ _ l       .o. ! nunaruluq (HBC form)
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r -> "'" u r                       || VowHatted Sep+ _ l       .o. ! nuna'urluq
                  r [ụ|ụ́] r -> ("'") "u͡r"                    || [Vow|VowStress] Sep+ _ l  ;  ! angyau͡rluq/angya'u͡rluq

define DropHattedE ê -> 0 .o.
                [..] -> e || p _ Sep* p , t _ Sep* t , c _ Sep* c , k _ Sep* k , q _ Sep* q , 
                             v _ Sep* v , l _ Sep* l , s _ Sep* s , g _ Sep* g , r _ Sep* r , u͡g _ Sep* u͡g , u͡r _ Sep* u͡r ,
                             vv _ Sep* vv , ll _ Sep* ll , ss _ Sep* ss, gg _ Sep* gg , rr _ Sep* rr , u͡gg _ Sep* u͡gg , u͡rr _ Sep* u͡rr ,
                             v _ Sep* vv , l _ Sep* ll , s _ Sep* ss, g _ Sep* gg , r _ Sep* rr , u͡g _ Sep* u͡gg , u͡r _ Sep* u͡rr ,
                             m _ Sep* m , n _ Sep* n , ng _ Sep* ng , m̄ _ Sep* m̄ , n̄ _ Sep* n̄ , n͞g _ Sep* n͞g , 
                             w _ Sep* w , y _ Sep* y , c _ Sep* t , t _ Sep* c                                                       ; ! maybe c _ Sep* n , n _ Sep* c ??

define TripleConsonant  rr   ->  0 || _ q Sep* Con                .o. ! rqe- bases drop r
                       [..]  ->  e || Con _ Sep* [s|ss] Sep* Con  .o.
                       [..]  ->  e || Con Sep* t _ Sep* Con       .o.
                       [..] (->) e || Con Sep* Con _ Sep* Con     .o.
                       [..]  ->  e || Con _ Sep* Con Sep* Con      ;

define TripleVowel  AllFVow -> 0 || [Con|.#.] Sep* AllFVow Sep* _ Sep* AllFVow Sep* [Con|.#.] ;

define ConnectiveMood  ạ -> 0               || _ Sep [a|á] \.#.                          .o. ! caliạan -> calian 
                       ụ -> 0               || _ Sep [a|á] \.#.                          .o. ! calikụan -> calikan 
                       [e|é] -> e ("'")     || [VowStress|VowHatted|Con] Sep ng _ [r|rr] .o. ! qavangrarpet -> qavange(')rpet
                       [e|é] -> "'" e ("'") || Vow Sep ng _ [r|rr]                        ;  ! iqvangrarma -> iqvang'e(')rma

define WordAdjustments ġ -> 0       || Vow _                           .o. ! túntuvâyaġaq -> túntuvâyaaq 
                       t (->) c     || \.#. _ [e|é] Sep* t ,               ! angutet -> angucet
                                       \.#. _ [e|é] Sep* ss Sep* Stop  .o. ! kitugtesciigataqa -> kitugcesciigataqa
                       t [e|é] Sep rr (->) Sep q || _ Vow              .o. ! inarterraarluni -> inarqaarluni for -rraar- postbase
                       â r [a|á] (->) a "'" a || Sep [q|k] _ q         .o. ! quuyurniqaraqluni -> quuyurniqa'aqluni for -qaqe- postbase
                       [a|á] r [a|á] (->) a   || Sep [q|k] _ q         .o. ! nerqaraqluni -> nerqaqluni for -qaqe- postbase
                       [a|â|á] -> e || Sep q _ Sep* [r|rr]              ;  ! apteqarru -> apteqerru for -qar- postbase

define arDeletion  "â" -> a "'" a,
                   "î" -> i "'" i,
                   "û" -> u "'" u  || _ Sep* Con Sep* "ạ" q Sep* .#.                    .o. ! V̂r(ar)# -> V'Vr
                   "ạ" q -> 0 || _ Sep* .#.                                             .o. ! wordFinal
                   ["ạ"|"ạ́"] [r|rr] -> 0 || Vow Sep* VowStress Sep* Con Sep* _ Sep* Con .o. ! VV́r(ar) -> VV́r
                   "ạ" [r|rr] -> 0 || Con Sep* VowStress Sep* Con Sep* _ Sep* Con       .o. ! CV́r(ar) -> CV́r
                   "â" -> a "'" á,
                   "î" -> i "'" í,
                   "û" -> u "'" ú  || _ Sep* Con Sep* ["ạ"|"ạ́"] [r|rr] Sep* Con         .o. ! V̂r(ar) -> V'Vr
                   ["ạ"|"ạ́"] [r|rr] -> 0 || Vow "'" VowStress Sep* Con Sep* _ Sep* Con  .o. ! V̂r(ar) -> V'Vr
                   a -> á "'",
                   e -> é "'",
                   i -> í "'",
                   u -> ú "'" || _ Sep* Con Sep* "ạ́" [r|rr] Sep* Con                     .o. ! Vr(ár) -> V́(')r
                   "ạ́" [r|rr] -> 0 || VowStress "'" Sep* Con Sep* _ Sep* Con             .o. ! Vr(ár) -> V́(')r
                   "'" (->) 0 || VowStress _ Sep* Con                                     ;  ! Vr(ár) -> V́(')r


define RemoveApostrophe "'" -> 0 || [ .#. | Con ] Sep* AllVow Sep* Con Sep* _ Sep* AllVow Sep* AllVow , ! [#|C]VC'VV
                                    VoiceCon Sep*  _ Sep* VoiceCon                                    ; 

define AddApostrophe [..] -> "'" || VlessCon _ Sep* VoiceCon , n _ Sep* g   ;      ! maybe VoiceFric _ Sep* VlessCon  ???

define ToOrthography  vv -> v,
                      ll -> l,
                      ss -> s,
                      gg -> g,
                      rr -> r,
                      u͡gg -> u͡g,
                      u͡rr -> u͡r || [ Stop | VlessFric ] Sep* _           ,
                                 _ Sep* [ Stop ]                        .o.
                      m̄ -> m,
                      n̄ -> n,
                      n͞g -> ng || [ Stop | VlessFric ] Sep* _           .o.
                      rr -> r  || _ Sep* .#.                            .o.
                      ss -> s  || .#. Sep*  _                           .o.
                      [â|á|ạ|ậ|ạ́] -> a                                  .o.
                      [ê|é] -> e                                        .o.
                      [î|í] -> i                                        .o.
                      [û|ú|ụ|ụ́|ụ̂] -> u                                  .o.
                      ["[e]"|"[é]"|"[ê]"] -> e                          .o.
                      ġ -> g                                             ;

define RemoveLigature m̄ (->) m     .o.
                      n̄ (->) n     .o.
                      n͞g (->) ng   .o.
                      u͡g (->) u g   .o.
                      u͡r (->) u r   .o.
                      u͡gg (->) u gg .o.
                      u͡rr (->) u rr  ;

define FinalWordApostrophe Vow (->) "'" || Con Sep* _ Sep* .#. ;


define Lowercase "A"   -> a,
                 "B"   -> b,
                 "C"   -> c,
                 "D"   -> d,
                 "E"   -> e,
                 "F"   -> f,
                 "G"   -> g,
                 "H"   -> h,
                 "I"   -> i,
                 "J"   -> j,
                 "K"   -> k,
                 "L"   -> l,
                 "M"   -> m,
                 "N"   -> n,
                 "O"   -> o,
                 "P"   -> p,
                 "Q"   -> q,
                 "R"   -> r,
                 "S"   -> s,
                 "T"   -> t,
                 "U"   -> u,
                 "V"   -> v,
                 "W"   -> w,
                 "X"   -> x,
                 "Y"   -> y,
                 "Z"   -> z,
                 "M̄"   -> m̄,
                 "N̄"   -> n̄,
                 "Vv"  -> vv,
                 "Ll"  -> ll,
                 "Ss"  -> ss,
                 "Gg"  -> gg,
                 "Rr"  -> rr,
                 "Ng"  -> ng,
                 "N͞g"  -> n͞g,
                 "U͡g"  -> u͡g,
                 "U͡r"  -> u͡r,
                 "U͡gg" -> u͡gg,
                 "U͡rr" -> u͡rr;
